New York, session 2025-2026, S2210.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 117 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the foregoing subdi- 4 visions of this section or any other provision of law, for the purposes 5 of eligibility for medical assistance pursuant to title eleven of arti- 6 cle five of this chapter or any successor provisions thereof, no person 7 shall be eligible therefor unless such person shall have been a resident 8 of this state for one year or more. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 10 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately the commissioner of 11 health is authorized to promulgate any and all rules and regulations and 12 take any other measures necessary to implement this act on its effective 13 date on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04363-01-5